Virginia statutes. Title 51.5. Persons With Disabilities.
Chapter 10. Local Disability Services Boards.

§§ 51.5-47 through 51.5-52.

Repealed by Acts 2011, cc. 41 and 51, cl. 2.

Editor’s note.

Former §§

51.5-47

through 51.5-52, relating to the establishment of local disability services boards, were derived from Acts 1992, c. 634; 1994, c. 76; 2000, c. 115.